Washington statutes.
RCW 36.68.110

Counties authorized to permit public libraries on land used for park and recreation purposes.

A county, acting through its county legislative authority, is authorized to permit the location of public libraries on land owned by the county that is used for park and recreation purposes, unless a covenant or other binding restriction precludes such uses.

[ 1993 c 84 s 1.]